Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part II Licensing of Broker-Dealers, Sales Representatives, and Investment Advisers and Investment Adviser Representatives

7-11-201.
Broker-dealer and sales representative licensing.

No person may transact business in this state as a broker-dealer or sales representative unless licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

No broker-dealer licensed under this chapter and no issuer may employ a person as a sales representative in this state unless the sales representative is licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

No broker-dealer or issuer engaged in offering securities in this state may employ, directly or indirectly, a person to engage in any activity in this state contrary to a suspension or bar from association with a broker-dealer or investment adviser imposed against that person by the director. No broker-dealer or issuer violates this subsection unless the broker-dealer or issuer knows or in the exercise of reasonable care should know of the suspension or bar. Upon request from a broker-dealer or issuer and for good cause shown, the director, by order, may waive the prohibition of this subsection regarding a person suspended or barred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-202.
Exempt broker-dealers and sales representatives.

The following broker-dealers are exempt from the licensing requirements of §

7-11-201

:

A broker-dealer who either is registered or, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, is not required to be registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., and who has no place of business in this state if:

The transactions effected by the broker-dealer in this state are exclusively with the issuer of the securities involved in the transactions, other broker-dealers licensed or exempt under this chapter, and financial or institutional investors;

The broker-dealer is licensed under the securities act of a state in which the broker-dealer maintains a place of business and the broker-dealer offers and sells in this state to a person who is an existing customer of the broker-dealer and whose principal place of residence is not in this state; and

Other broker-dealers the director, by rule or order, exempts.

The exemption provided in subsection (a)(1)(i) of this section is not available to a broker-dealer who deals solely in governmental securities and is not registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., unless the broker-dealer is subject to supervision as a dealer in government securities by the federal reserve board.

The following sales representatives are exempt from the licensing requirements of §

7-11-201

:

A sales representative acting for a broker-dealer exempt under subsection (a) of this section;

A sales representative acting exclusively for an issuer in effecting transactions in a security exempted by §

7-11-401(1)

— (4) and (10) — (12);

A sales representative acting for an issuer effecting offers or sales of securities in transactions exempted by §

7-11-402

;

A sales representative acting for an issuer effecting transactions with employees, partners, officers, or directors of the issuer, a parent or a wholly owned subsidiary of the issuer, if no commission or other similar compensation is paid or given directly or indirectly to the sales representative for soliciting an employee, partner, officer, or director in this state;

A sales representative acting for an issuer effecting offers or sales of securities that are covered securities under § 18(b)(3) or § 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(3) or 77r(b)(4)(D), provided that no commission or other remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any person in this state;

A sales representative whose transactions in this state are limited to only those transactions set forth in § 15(h)(2) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78o(h)(2); and

Other sales representatives that the director exempts by rule or order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 422, § 1.

7-11-203.
Investment adviser and investment adviser representative licensing.

No person may transact business in this state as an investment adviser or an investment adviser representative unless licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

No investment adviser licensed under this chapter may employ a person as an investment adviser representative in this state unless the investment adviser representative is licensed or exempt from licensing under this chapter.

No investment adviser may directly or indirectly employ a person to engage in any activity in this state contrary to a suspension or bar from association with a broker-dealer or investment adviser imposed against that person by the director. A federal covered adviser may not directly or indirectly employ a person having a place of business in this state to engage in any activity in this state if that person is currently subject to a suspension or bar from association with a broker-dealer or investment adviser against that person by the director. No investment adviser or federal covered adviser violates this subsection unless the investment adviser or federal covered adviser knows or in the exercise of reasonable care should know of the suspension or bar. Upon request from an investment adviser or a federal covered adviser and for good cause shown, the director may by order waive the prohibition of this subsection regarding a suspended or barred person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-204.
Exempt investment advisers and investment adviser representatives.

The following investment advisers and investment adviser representatives are exempt from the licensing requirements of §

7-11-203

:

An investment adviser who is not required to be registered as an investment adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq., if:

Its only clients in this state are other investment advisers, federal covered advisers, broker-dealers, financial or institutional investors; and the investment adviser has no place of business in this state and the investment adviser directs business communications in this state to a person who is an existing client of the investment adviser and whose principal place of residence is not in this state; or

The investment adviser has no place of business in this state and the investment adviser, during the preceding twelve (12) month period, has had not more than five (5) clients, other than those specified in subsection (1)(i), who are residents of this state;

An investment adviser representative if the investment adviser with whom it is associated is exempt under subsection (1) of this section; and

Other investment advisers or investment adviser representatives the director exempts by rule or order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 118, § 1.

7-11-205.
Application.

An applicant for licensing as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative shall file with the director an application for licensing and a consent to service of process under §

7-11-708

. The application for licensing must contain the information that the director, by rule, determines is necessary.

The requirements of subsection (a) are satisfied by an applicant who has filed and maintains a completed and current registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission or a self-regulatory organization by filing with the director notice of the registration in the form and content determined by rule by the director and a consent to service of process under §

7-11-708

. The registration information filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission or self-regulatory organization must be available to the director through a central registration depository system approved by the director. The director may require by order the submission of additional information by an applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-206.
Licensing and notice fees; and filing requirements for federal covered advisers.

A federal covered adviser or an applicant for licensing shall pay an annual fee as follows:

Broker-dealer three hundred dollars ($300) and for each branch office one hundred dollars ($100);

Sales representative one hundred dollars ($100.00);

Investment adviser three hundred dollars ($300);

Investment adviser representative sixty dollars ($60.00); and

Federal covered adviser three hundred dollars ($300).

Except with respect to federal covered advisers whose only clients are those described in §

7-11-204(1)(i)

, a federal covered adviser shall file any documents filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission with the director, that the director requires by rule or order, together with any notice fee and consent to service of process that the director requires by rule or order. The notice filings under this subsection expire annually on December 31, unless renewed.

A notice filing under this section is effective from receipt until the end of the calendar year. A notice filing may be renewed by filing any documents that have been filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission as required by the director along with a renewal fee of three hundred dollars ($300).

A federal covered adviser may terminate a notice filing upon providing the director notice of the termination, which is effective upon receipt by the director.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, until October 11, 1999, the director may require the registration as an investment adviser of any federal covered adviser who has failed to promptly pay the fees required by this section after written notification from the director of the nonpayment or underpayment of the fees. A federal covered adviser is considered to have promptly paid the fees if they are remitted to the director within fifteen (15) days following the federal covered adviser’s receipt of written notice from the director.

For purposes of this section, “branch office” means any location where one or more associated persons of a broker-dealer regularly conducts the business of effecting any transactions in, or inducing or attempting to induce the purchase or sale of any security, or is held out as such, excluding:

Any location that is established solely for customer service and/or back office type functions where no sales activities are conducted and that is not held out to the public as a branch office;

Any location that is the associated person’s primary residence; provided that:

Only one associated person, or multiple associated persons who reside at that location and are members of the same immediate family, conduct business at the location;

The location is not held out to the public as an office and the associated person does not meet with customers at the location;

Neither customer funds nor securities are handled at that location;

The associated person is assigned to a designated branch office, and such designated branch office is reflected on all business cards, stationery, advertisements, and other communications to the public by such associated person;

The associated person’s correspondence and communications with the public are subject to the firm’s supervision in accordance with Rule 3010 of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority;

Electronic communications are made through the broker-dealer’s electronic system;

All orders are entered through the designated branch office or an electronic system established by the broker-dealer that is reviewable at the branch office;

Written supervisory procedures pertaining to supervision of sales activities conducted at the residence are maintained by the broker-dealer; and

A list of the residence locations is maintained by the broker-dealer;

Any location, other than a primary residence, that is used for securities business for less than thirty (30) business days in any one calendar year, provided the broker-dealer complies with the provisions of subsections (f)(2)(i) through (ix) above;

Any office of convenience, where associated person(s) occasionally and exclusively by appointment meet with customers, that is not held out to the public as an office;

Any location that is used primarily to engage in non-securities activities and from which the associated person(s) effects no more than twenty-five (25) securities transactions in any one calendar year; provided that any advertisement or sales literature identifying such location also sets forth the address and telephone number of the location from which the associated person(s) conducting business at the non-branch locations are directly supervised;

The floor of a registered national securities exchange where a broker-dealer conducts a direct access business with public customers;

A temporary location established in response to the implementation of a business continuity plan.

Notwithstanding the exclusions in subsection (f), any location that is responsible for supervising the activities of persons associated with the broker-dealer at one or more non-branch locations of the broker-dealer is considered to be a branch office.

The term “business day” as used in subsection (f) shall not include any partial business day provided that the associated person spends at least four (4) hours on such business day at his or her designated branch office during the hours that such office is normally open for business.

Where the office of convenience is located on bank premises, signage necessary to comply with applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations and applicable rules and regulations of the New York Stock Exchange, other self-regulatory organizations, and securities and banking regulators may be displayed and shall not be deemed “holding out” for purposes of subsection (f)(4).

If an application is denied or withdrawn or the license is revoked, suspended, or withdrawn, the director is not required to refund the fee paid.

The director may issue a stop order suspending the activities of a federal covered adviser in this state if the director reasonably believes there has been a violation of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 12; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 6, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

7-11-207.
Examinations.

The director may by rule or order impose an examination requirement upon an applicant or class of applicants for licensing under this chapter.

An examination may be administered by the director or a designee of the director. An examination may be oral or written or both and may differ for each class of applicants.

The director may by rule or order waive an examination requirement imposed under subsection (a) as to a person or class of persons if the director determines that the examination is not necessary for the protection of investors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-208.
Licensing.

Unless a proceeding under §

7-11-212

is instituted or the applicant is notified that the application is incomplete, the license of a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes effective thirty (30) days after the later of the date an application for licensing is filed and is completed or the date an amendment to an application is filed and is complete. In either case the license becomes effective only if all examination requirements imposed under §

7-11-207

are satisfied. An application is complete when the applicant has furnished information responsive to each applicable item of the application. The director may by order authorize an earlier effective date of licensing.

The license of a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative is effective until terminated by expiration, revocation, or withdrawal.

The license of a sales representative is only effective with respect to transactions effected on behalf of the broker-dealer or issuer for whom the sales representative is licensed.

No person may act at any one time as a sales representative for more than one broker-dealer or for more than one issuer, unless the broker-dealers or issuers for whom the sales representative acts are affiliated by direct or indirect common control or the director authorizes multiple licenses by rule or order.

If a person licensed as a sales representative terminates association with a broker-dealer or issuer, or terminates activities that make the person a sales representative, the sales representative and the broker-dealer or issuer on whose behalf the sales representative was acting shall promptly notify the director.

The license of an investment adviser representative is only effective as to transactions effected as an associated person of the investment adviser or federal covered adviser as to whom the investment adviser representative is licensed.

No person may act at any one time as an investment adviser or federal covered adviser representative for more than one investment adviser, unless the investment advisers or federal covered advisers for whom the investment adviser representative acts are affiliated by direct or indirect common control or the director authorizes multiple licenses by rule or order.

If a person licensed as an investment adviser representative terminates association with an investment adviser or terminates activities that make the person an investment adviser representative, the investment adviser representative and the investment adviser on whose behalf the investment adviser representative was acting shall promptly notify the director.

The director may authorize by rule one or more special classifications of licenses as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative to be issued to applicants subject to limitations and conditions on the nature of the activities that may be conducted by persons so licensed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 354, § 20.

7-11-209.
Post-licensing requirements.

The director may require by rule a licensed broker-dealer who is not registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., to maintain minimum net capital and a prescribed ratio between net capital and aggregate indebtedness that may vary with the type or class of broker-dealer.

The director may require by rule a licensed investment adviser who is not registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq., to maintain a minimum net worth subject to the limitations set forth in § 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a.

If a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser knows, or has reasonable cause to know, that a requirement imposed on it under subsection (a) is not being met, the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall promptly notify the director of its current financial condition.

The director may require by rule the furnishing of a fidelity bond from a broker-dealer who is not registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.

A licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser shall file with the director the financial and other information the director determines, by rule or order, to be necessary.

A licensed broker-dealer required to file financial reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., may satisfy periodic financial report requirements of subsection (c) by filing with the director a copy of the financial reports filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.

A licensed investment adviser shall file with the director any financial reports, subject to the limitations of § 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a, that the director by rule or order requires.

A licensed broker-dealer or sales representative shall comply with the recordkeeping requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq. A licensed investment adviser subject to the limitations of § 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a, shall maintain records the director requires by rule or order.

Required records may be maintained in any form of data storage if the records are readily accessible to the director.

Required records must be preserved for any period that the director may require by rule or order, subject to the limitations of § 15 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78o, and § 222 of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-18a, for broker-dealers and investment advisers, respectively.

If the information contained in a document filed with the director as part of the application for licensing or under this section, except information the director excludes by rule or order, is inaccurate or incomplete in a material respect, the licensed person shall promptly file correcting information, unless notification of termination has been given under §

7-11-208(e)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-210.
Licensing of successor firms.

A licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser may file an application for licensing of a successor, whether or not the successor is in existence, if the fee the director prescribes for the application is submitted with the application.

When a broker-dealer or investment adviser succeeds to and continues the business of a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser, the license of the predecessor remains effective as the license of the successor for sixty (60) days after the succession, if an application for licensing is filed by the successor within thirty (30) days after the succession.

Licensing of each then licensed sales representative of the broker-dealer or of each then licensed investment adviser representative of the investment adviser filing an application under subsection (a) or (b) continues automatically without a separate filing or fee upon the licensing of the successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-211.
Inspection power.

Without previous notice, the director may examine or investigate in a manner reasonable under the circumstances the records, within or without this state, of a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative licensed by the state or entitled to an exemption from licensing as well as any person who may be acting as a broker, dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative without a license or exemption to engage in such activity(ies) in order to determine compliance with this chapter. Broker-dealers, sales representatives, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives must make their records available to the director in legible form.

The director may copy records or require a licensed person to copy records and provide the copies to the director to the extent and in a manner reasonable under these circumstances.

The director may impose a reasonable fee for the expense of conducting an examination or an investigation under this section.

Upon receipt of a report or complaint, the director may conduct an inspection to determine whether any violation or unlicensed activity has occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 1.

7-11-212.
Grounds for denial, suspension, and revocation.

The director may by order:

Deny, suspend, or revoke a license;

Limit the securities activities that an applicant or licensed person may perform in this state;

Bar a broker-dealer or investment adviser from conducting any securities activities in this state;

Bar an applicant or licensed person from association with a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser; or

Bar from employment with a licensed broker-dealer or investment adviser a person who is a partner, officer, director, or a person occupying a similar status or performing a similar function for an applicant or licensed person.

These actions may be taken only if the director finds that the order is in the public interest and that the applicant or licensed person or, in the case of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, a partner, officer, or director, a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly controlling the broker-dealer or investment adviser has done any of the following:

Filed an application for licensing with the director which, as of its effective date or any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, contained any untrue statement of material fact or omitted to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

Willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with this chapter, a predecessor act, or a rule or order under this chapter or a predecessor act;

Is the subject of an adjudication or determination, after notice and opportunity for hearing, within the last five (5) years by a securities agency or administrator of another state or a court of competent jurisdiction that the person has willfully violated the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq., the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq., the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 et seq., or the Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. § 2 et seq., or the securities law of any other state but only if the acts constituting the violation of that state’s law would constitute a violation of this chapter had the acts occurred in this state;

Within the last ten (10) years, has been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor which the director finds:

Involves the purchase or sale of a security; the taking of a false oath, the making of a false report, bribery, perjury, burglary, robbery, or attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses;

Arises out of the conduct of business as a broker-dealer, investment adviser, depository institution, insurance company, or fiduciary; or

Involves the larceny, theft, robbery, extortion, forgery, counterfeiting, fraudulent concealment, embezzlement, fraudulent conversion, or misappropriation of funds or securities or attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the above offenses;

Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from acting as an investment adviser, underwriter, broker-dealer, or as an affiliated person or employee of an investment company, depository institution, or insurance company, or from engaging in or continuing conduct or practice in connection with any of the foregoing activities, or in connection with the purchase or sale of a security;

Is the subject of an order of the director denying, suspending, or revoking the person’s license as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative;

Is the subject of any of the following orders that are currently effective and were issued within the last five (5) years:

An order by the securities agency or administrator of another state or Canadian province or territory, or by the Securities and Exchange Commission, entered after notice and opportunity for hearing, denying, suspending, or revoking the person’s license as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or the substantial equivalent of those terms as defined in this chapter;

A suspension or expulsion from membership in or association with a member of a self-regulatory organization registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or the Commodity Exchange Act;

A United States postal service fraud order;

A cease and desist order entered after notice and opportunity for hearing by the director, the securities agency or administrator of another state, or a Canadian province or territory, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or the commodity futures trading commission; or

An order by the commodity futures trading commission denying, suspending, or revoking registration under the Commodity Exchange Act;

Has engaged in unethical or dishonest practices in the securities business;

Is insolvent, either in the sense that liabilities exceed assets, or in the sense that obligations cannot be met as they mature, but the director may not enter an order against a broker-dealer or investment adviser under this subsection without a finding of insolvency as to the broker-dealer or investment adviser;

Is determined by the director in compliance with §

7-11-213

not to be qualified on the basis of the lack of training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business;

Has failed reasonably to supervise a sales representative, investment adviser representative, or an employee; or

Has failed to pay the proper filing fee within thirty (30) days after being notified by the director of a deficiency, but the director shall vacate an order under this subsection when the deficiency is corrected.

The director may not begin a proceeding on the basis of a fact or transaction known to the director when the license became effective unless the proceeding is begun within the ninety (90) days after issuance of the license.

If the director finds that an applicant or licensed person is no longer in existence, has ceased to do business as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, is adjudicated mentally incompetent or subjected to the control of a committee, conservator, or guardian, or cannot be located after reasonable search, the director may by order deny the application or revoke the license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 56, § 1.

7-11-213.
Denial, suspension, or revocation on grounds of lack of qualification.

The director’s determination that an applicant or licensed person lacks qualification under §

7-11-212

is limited by the following provisions. The director:

May not enter an order against a broker-dealer on the basis of the lack of qualification of:

A person other than the broker-dealer if the broker-dealer is an individual; or

A sales representative of the broker-dealer.

May not enter an order against an investment adviser on the basis of the lack of qualification of:

A person other than the investment adviser if the investment adviser is an individual;

Any other person who represents the investment adviser in doing an act that makes the person an investment adviser; or

An investment adviser representative of the investment adviser.

May not enter an order solely on the basis of lack of experience of the applicant or licensed person if the applicant or licensed person is qualified by training or knowledge, or both.

Shall consider that a sales representative who will work under the supervision of a licensed broker-dealer need not have the same qualifications as a broker-dealer.

Shall consider that an investment adviser is not necessarily qualified solely on the basis of experience as a broker-dealer or sales representative.

Shall consider that an investment adviser representative who will work under the supervision of a licensed investment adviser need not have the same qualifications as an investment adviser.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, 1.

7-11-214.
Withdrawal.

An application for a license may be withdrawn by the applicant without prejudice before the license becomes effective.

Withdrawal from licensing as a broker-dealer, sales representative, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes effective thirty (30) days after receipt by the director of an application to withdraw or within any shorter period the director determines by order, unless:

A revocation or suspension proceeding is pending when the application is filed;

A proceeding to revoke or suspend or to impose conditions upon the withdrawal is instituted within thirty (30) days after the application is filed; or

Additional information is requested by the director regarding the withdrawal application.

If a proceeding is pending or instituted under subsection (b), withdrawal becomes effective at the time and upon the conditions the director determines by order. If additional information is requested, withdrawal is effective thirty (30) days after the additional information is filed. Although no proceeding is pending or instituted and withdrawal becomes effective, the director may institute a proceeding under §

7-11-212

within one year after withdrawal became effective and enter an order as of the last date on which licensing was effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-215.
Custody of clients’ securities and funds.

Unless prohibited by rule or order of the director, an investment adviser registered under this chapter may take or retain custody of securities or funds of a client.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.